Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201113-901
Act, how cited.

Sections
13-901 to 13-928 shall be known and
may be cited as the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 20, p. 634;

Laws 1984, LB 590, § 1;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 258, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1987, § 23-2420;

Laws 2007, LB564, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB589, § 1.
May 25, 2011